Alabama, session 2026rs, HB508.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The following amendment to the Constitution
of Alabama of 2022, is proposed:
PROPOSED AMENDMENT
Section 28-11.20 of the Constitution of Alabama of
2022, relating to Etowah County and requiring voter approval
to annex any territory within the county into any municipality
not located wholly within the boundaries of the county before
January 1, 1986, is repealed.
Upon ratification of this constitutional amendment, the
Code Commissioner shall number and place this amendment as
appropriate in the constitution omitting this instructional
paragraph and may make the following nonsubstantive revisions:
change capitalization, hierarchy, spelling, and punctuation
for purposes of style and uniformity; correct manifest
grammatical, clerical, and typographical errors; revise
internal or external citations and cross-references; harmonize
language; and translate effective dates.
END PROPOSED AMENDMENT
Section 2. An election upon the proposed amendment
Page 1

Section 2. An election upon the proposed amendment
HB508 Enrolled
shall be held in accordance with Sections 284, 284.01, and 285
of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, and the election laws
of this state. The appropriate election official shall assign
a ballot number for the proposed constitutional amendment on
the election ballot and shall set forth the following
description of the substance or subject matter of the proposed
constitutional amendment:
"Relating to Etowah County, proposing an amendment to
the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, to repeal Section
28-11.20 of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, requiring
voter approval before annexing any territory within the county
into a municipality not located wholly within the boundaries
of the county before January 1, 1986.
Proposed by Act ____."
This description shall be followed by the following
language:
"Yes( ) No( )."
Section 3. The proposed amendment shall become valid as
part of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, when approved by
a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
Page 2

a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
HB508 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 05-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 17-Mar-26 Passed



Page 3